Utah statutes.
59-2-1201.   Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to provide general property tax relief for certain persons who own or rent their places of residence through a system of tax credits, refunds, and appropriations from the General Fund.  The relief is to offset in part the general tax burden, a significant portion of which, directly or indirectly, is represented by property tax.  Accordingly, the tax relief provided by this part is determined in part by reference to the property tax assessment and collection mechanisms, but, however, is not limited to property tax relief nor is it formulated upon the Legislature's power to relieve those taxes.  It is for the general relief of all taxes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 4, 1987 General Session

